Maryland, session 2026, SB0261.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Financial Institutions
12–401.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(q) (1) “Money transmitter” means a person that engages in money
transmission that is required to be licensed under this subtitle, whether or not the person
maintains a license.
(2) “Money transmitter” includes:
(i) A bill payer service; and
(ii) An accelerated mortgage payment service.
– 1 –

Ch. 21 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) “MONEY TRANSMITTER” DOES NOT INCLUDE A PERSON
DESIGNATED AS AN AGENT OF A PAYOR FOR THE PURPOSE OF PROVIDING PAYROLL
PROCESSING SERVICES FOR WHICH THE AGENT WOULD OTHERWISE NEED TO BE
LICENSED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE, IF:
(I) THERE IS WRITTEN AGREEMENT BETWEEN THE PAYOR AND
THE AGENT THAT DIRECTS THE AGENT TO PROVIDE PAYROLL PROCESSING
SERVICES ON THE PAYOR’S BEHALF;
(II) THE PAYOR HOLDS THE AGENT OUT TO EMPLOYEES AND
OTHER PAYEES AS PROVIDING PAYROLL PROCESSING SERVICES ON THE PAYOR’S
BEHALF; AND
(III) THE PAYOR’S OBLIGATION TO A PAYEE, INCLUDING AN
EMPLOYEE OR ANOTHER PARTY ENTITLED TO RECEIVE FUNDS VIA THE PAYROLL
PROCESSING SERVICES PROVIDED BY THE AGENT, IS NOT EXTINGUISHED IF THE
AGENT FAILS TO REMIT THE FUNDS TO THE PAYEE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 14, 2026.
– 2 –